Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-918
Drinking water; toilet facilities; locomotives and waycars; duty to provide; violation; penalty.

Each railroad which operates in this state shall provide sanitary drinking water and toilet facilities on all road locomotives and waycars owned by such railroad when ordered, after investigation, notice, and hearing, by the Public Service Commission. The commission shall specify the type of facilities that shall be installed on each road locomotive and waycar placed in service after January 1, 1971. This section shall not prevent any railroad from operating equipment not in conformity with this section for less than fifty miles. Any railroad which violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars.

Laws 1969, c. 598, § 1, p. 2453;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 23.